Utah statutes.
53C-4-302.   Public land grants -- Board and director to request a survey.

The board and director shall take all necessary steps to encourage the federal Bureau of Land Management to complete the survey of public unsurveyed lands for the purpose of satisfying the public land grants to this state in accordance with federal law.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

